Maryland, session 2025, SB0552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.1.
(b) (1) The State Board shall establish high school curriculum, college and
career readiness standards, and graduation requirements for all public schools in
accordance with this section.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0552*

SENATE BILL 552
(2) The State Board shall coordinate and consult with the Maryland Higher
Education Commission, the Governor’s Workforce Development Board, the Maryland
Association of Community Colleges, and the Accountability and Implementation Board in
performing its duties under this subsection.
(M) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, AND EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH STUDENT, AS A
REQUIREMENT FOR GRADUATION, SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT:
(I) THE FREE APPLICATION FOR FEDERAL STUDENT AID
(FAFSA) TO THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION; OR
(II) THE MARYLAND STATE FINANCIAL AID APPLICATION
(MSFAA) TO THE MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION.
(2) A STUDENT OR THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR
STUDENT MAY SUBMIT TO THE COUNTY BOARD A FORM SIGNED BY THE STUDENT OR
THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE MINOR STUDENT STATING THAT THE
STUDENT UNDERSTANDS THE FAFSA OR MSFAA AND DECLINES TO COMPLETE
AND SUBMIT THE FAFSA OR MSFAA.
(3) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL WAIVE THE REQUIREMENT IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF:
(I) 1. A STUDENT COMPLETES ALL OTHER REQUIREMENTS
FOR GRADUATION IN THIS SECTION; AND
2. THE STUDENT’S PRINCIPAL ATTESTS THAT THE
STUDENT HAS MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO COMPLETE THE FAFSA OR MSFAA;
OR
(II) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT REQUESTS A
WAIVER DUE TO EXTENUATING CIRCUMSTANCES.
(4) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL INCLUDE GUIDELINES TO ENSURE THAT EACH STUDENT RECEIVES
ADEQUATE SUPPORT IN COMPLETING AND SUBMITTING THE FAFSA OR MSFAA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1 each year,
beginning in 2027 and ending in 2032, each county board shall report to the Senate
Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Committee on Ways

SENATE BILL 552 3
and Means, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) the number of students who completed and submitted the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or the Maryland State Financial Aid
Application (MSFAA) in the immediately preceding school year;
(2) the number of students who declined to complete and submit the
FAFSA or the MSFAA in the immediately preceding school year; and
(3) the number of students who received a waiver under this Act in the
immediately preceding school year.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.